California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “commercial agricultural mulch film” means film plastic that is used only as a technical tool in commercial farming applications.

(g) (1) A person shall not sell or offer for sale a product in this state that is labeled with the term “compostable” or “home compostable” unless the product satisfies all of the following:

(A) If any standard specification is
 applicable to the product pursuant to this chapter and the department has approved a third-party certification entity to certify products according to that standard specification, the product shall have certification that it meets at least one such standard from an approved third-party certification entity for the standard. This requirement shall only apply on and after January 1, 2024, and it shall not apply unless there is, and has been for at least one year immediately prior to the product being sold or offered for sale, a third-party certification entity approved by the department to provide the applicable certification.

(B) On and after January 1, 2026, is an allowable agricultural organic input under the requirements of the United States Department of Agriculture National Organic Program. By January 1, 2024, the department, through a public stakeholder process, shall determine whether, for purposes of this section, it would be feasible to
 separate the collection of products in order to recover organic waste that is suitable for use in organic agricultural applications from the collection of products not suitable for use in organic agricultural applications. If the department determines that such bifurcation is feasible and would enable efficient processing by solid waste processing facilities, the department shall adopt regulations on or before January 1, 2026, to establish a bifurcated approach, and products that are not collected for the purpose of recovering organic waste that is suitable for use in organic agricultural applications shall comply with the department’s regulations and are not subject to the requirements of this subparagraph. The director may grant a five-year extension for complying with this requirement if either of the following apply:

(i) The product or substance has or will soon be, as determined by the director, included as allowed on the National List of
 Allowed and Prohibited Substances (Sections 205.600 to 205.607, inclusive, of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations).

(ii) The product or substance has or will soon be, as determined by the director, included as an allowable organic input for compost under federal law.

(C) Does not have a total organic fluorine concentration of greater than 100 parts per million, unless the department adopts a different standard that it determines would more effectively limit the presence of perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substances.

(D) Is labeled in a manner that distinguishes the product from a noncompostable product upon reasonable inspection by consumers and to help enable efficient processing by solid waste processing facilities.

(E) Is designed to be
 associated with the recovery of desirable organic wastes, such as food scraps and yard trimmings, that are collected for composting, unless the product complies with the department’s regulations pursuant to subparagraph (B), to the extent the department elects to adopt such regulations.

(2) The department may adopt regulations for determining whether products comply with the requirements of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1). The department, in adopting regulations pursuant to this subdivision, may consider whether the regulations are consistent with the product labeling requirements of other states, stakeholder input, and industry-standard guidelines. The regulations may include requirements that products are not designed, pigmented, or advertised in a manner that is misleading to consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 991, Sec. 2.   (SB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42357.5.

(a) A manufacturer of a compostable plastic bag meeting an ASTM standard specification specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42356 or Section 42356.1 shall ensure that the compostable plastic bag is readily and easily identifiable from other plastic bags in a manner that is consistent with the Federal Trade Commission Guides for the Use of Environmental Marketing Claims (Part 260 (commencing with
 Section 260.1) of Subchapter B of Chapter I of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations).

(b) For purposes of this section, “readily and easily identifiable” means labeling that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Labeled with a certification logo indicating the bag meets the ASTM D6400 standard specification if the bag has been certified as meeting that standard by a recognized third-party independent verification.

(2) Labeled in accordance with one of the following:

(A) The bag is made of a uniform color of green and labeled with the word “compostable” on one side of the bag, and the label shall be at least one inch in height.

(B) Labeled with the word “compostable” on both
 sides of the bag and the label shall be one of the following:

(i) Green color lettering at least one inch in height.

(ii) Within a contrasting green color band of at least one inch in height on both sides of the bag with color contrasting lettering of at least one-half inch in height.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), if the bag is smaller than 14 inches by 14 inches, the lettering and stripe shall be in proportion to the size of the bag.

(d) A compostable plastic bag sold or distributed in the state shall not display a chasing arrow resin identification code or recycling type of symbol in any form.

(e) A manufacturer is required to comply with this section only to the
 extent that the labeling requirements of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) do not conflict with the Federal Trade Commission Guides for the Use of Environmental Marketing Claims (Part 260 (commencing with Section 260.1) of Subchapter B of Chapter I of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2013, pursuant to Section 42358.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42357.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, “plastic food container product” means a product made of plastic that includes a tray, clamshell container, or other receptacle and that is used, or intended to be used, to hold food.

(b) A manufacturer or supplier making an environmental marketing claim relating to the recycled content of a plastic food container product
 shall maintain information and documentation, which shall be in written form in its records, of both of the following in support of that claim:

(1) The recycled content for materials has been recovered or otherwise diverted from the solid waste stream either during the manufacturing process (preconsumer) or after consumer use (postconsumer).

(2) The recycled content claim conforms to the uniform standards for recycled content contained in the Federal Trade Commission Guides for the Use of Environmental Marketing Claims (16 C.F.R. Part 260).

(c) A manufacturer or supplier shall furnish the information and documentation that it is required to maintain pursuant to this section to any member of the public upon request or provide the information and documentation by furnishing a link to a document on its Internet Web site
 containing the information and documentation.

(d) This section does not limit the requirements of this chapter or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 664, Sec. 1.   (AB 1294)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

42358.

(a) A city, a county, or the state may impose civil liability in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation of this chapter, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second violation, and two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the third and any subsequent violation.

(b) Any civil penalties collected
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid to the office of the city attorney, city prosecutor, district attorney, or Attorney General, whichever office brought the action. The penalties collected pursuant to this section by the Attorney General may be expended by the Attorney General, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to enforce this chapter.

(c) The remedies provided by this section are not exclusive and are in addition to the remedies that may be available pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The costs incurred by a state agency in carrying out this chapter shall be recoverable by the Attorney General, upon the request of the agency, from the liable person or persons.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2013, pursuant to Section 42358.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42358.5.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (January 1, 2013) for Chapter 5.7, commencing with Section 42355, as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 594.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.9. Plastic Microbeads Nuisance Prevention Law [42360. - 42366.]

42360.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Plastic does not biodegrade into elements or compounds commonly found in nature like other organic materials, but, instead, upon exposure to the elements photodegrades into smaller pieces of plastic causing land and water pollution that is virtually impossible to remediate.

(b) Plastic pollution is the dominant type of anthropogenic debris found throughout the marine environment.

(c) Plastic pollution is an environmental and human health hazard and a public nuisance.

(d) Microplastics that are five millimeters or less in diameter become bioavailable as soon as they enter the marine environment and are ingested by marine organisms.

(e) Microplastics are persistent organic compounds that attract other pollutants commonly present in the environment, many of which are recognized to have serious deleterious impacts on human health or the environment, including DDT, DDE, PCBs, and flame retardants.

(f) PAHs, PCBs, and PBDEs from plastic transfer to fish tissue when ingested and bioaccumulate.

(g) Fish that humans consume have been found to ingest microplastics, which are then ingested by the humans who consume these fish.

(h) Consumer
 personal care products such as facial scrubs, soaps, and toothpaste increasingly contain thousands of microplastics in the form of plastic microbeads that are flushed down drains or make their way into the environment by other means as part of their intended use.

(i) Plastic microbeads in personal care products are generally not recoverable through ordinary wastewater treatment and can be released into the environment.

(j) Plastic microbeads have been found in surface waters within the United States, as well as in fish, marine mammals, reptiles,
 mussels, and worms.

(k) There are economically feasible alternatives to plastic microbeads used in personal care products, as evidenced by the current use of biodegradable, natural, abrasive materials in personal care products such as beeswax, shells, nuts, seeds, and sand.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42361.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Person” means an individual, business, or other entity.

(b) (1) “Personal care product” means an article intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced to, or otherwise applied to, the human body or any part
 thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and an article intended for use as a component of that type of article.

(2) “Personal care product” does not include a prescription drug, as defined in Section 110010.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Plastic microbead” means an intentionally added solid plastic particle measuring five millimeters or less in every dimension.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42362.

On and after January 1, 2020, a person shall not sell or offer for promotional purposes in this state any personal care products containing plastic microbeads that are used to exfoliate or cleanse in a rinse-off product, including, but not limited to, toothpaste.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42363.

Section 42362 shall not apply to a person that sells or offers for promotional purposes a personal care product containing plastic microbeads in an amount less than 1 part per million (ppm) by weight.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42364.

(a) A person who violates or threatens to violate Section 42362 may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) (1) A person who has violated Section 42362 is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per day for each violation in addition to any other penalty established by law. That civil penalty may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) In assessing the amount of a civil penalty for a violation of this chapter, the court shall consider all of the following:

(A) The nature and extent of the violation.

(B) The number of, and severity of, the violations.

(C) The economic effect of the penalty on the violator.

(D) Whether the violator took good faith measures to comply with this chapter and when these measures were taken.

(E) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated community as a whole.

(F) Any other factor that justice may require.

(c) Actions pursuant to this section may be
 brought by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the state, by a district attorney, by a city attorney, or by a city prosecutor in a city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor.

(d) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the office of the city attorney, city prosecutor, district attorney, or Attorney General, whichever office brought the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42366.

This chapter does not alter or diminish any legal obligation otherwise required in common law or by statute or regulation, and this chapter does not create or enlarge any defense in any action to enforce the legal obligation. Penalties and sanctions imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be in addition to any penalties or sanctions otherwise prescribed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Sustainable Packaging for the State of California Act of 2018 [42370. - 42370.7.]

42370.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Sustainable Packaging for the State of California Act of 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42370.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Beverage container” has the same meaning as defined in Section 14505.

(b) “Food service facility” means an operation or business that is located in a state-owned facility, operating on or acting as a concessionaire on state property, or under contract to provide food service to a state agency and that stores, prepares, packages, serves, vends, or otherwise provides prepared food. “Food service facility” may include, but is not limited to, a cafeteria, commissary, restaurant, deli, store, shop, market, or mobile food unit.

(c) (1) “Food service packaging” means a product used for serving or transporting prepared, ready-to-consume food or beverages, including, but not limited to, plates, cups, bowls, trays, and hinged or lidded containers.

(2) “Food service packaging” does not include any of the following:

(A) Straws, cup lids, plastic bags, and utensils.

(B) Single-use disposable packaging for unprepared foods.

(C) Beverage containers.

(D) Ceramic, porcelain, glass, or nonfoil metal food service packaging that is cleaned and reused by the food service facility.

(E) Products defined as drugs, devices, or medical food pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Secs. 321(g), 321(h), and 360ee(b)(3)) and recommended or prescribed by a medical professional or otherwise determined by a food service facility to be reasonably necessary for accommodating medical- or health-related needs, including packaging used for these products.

(F) Products, including, but not limited to, devices, adaptors, utensils, and containers, used at any of the following types of facilities and recommended or prescribed by a medical professional or otherwise determined by a
 food service facility to be reasonably necessary intended to assist the facility’s residents or other individuals receiving care at the facility in the performance of functions related to the service and consumption of food or to otherwise protect the facility’s residents’ or other individual’s health or safety, if the facility determines that the products, or their functional equivalents as determined by the facility, are not on the list developed by the department pursuant to Section 42370.3:

(i) A health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) A residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) A community care facility, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iv) Any other facility that provides medical treatment or other health-related services to patients under the care of a medical professional.

(d) “Prepared food” means a food or beverage prepared for consumption on or off a food service facility’s premises, using any cooking or food preparation technique. “Prepared food” does not include prepackaged, sealed food that is mass produced by a third party off the premises of the food service facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 755, Sec. 5.   (AB 1570)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42370.2.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2021, the department shall adopt regulations to establish a process, and develop criteria, for determining the types of food service packaging that are reusable, recyclable, or compostable.

(2) The department shall adopt the regulations in consultation with the Department of General Services, the Department of Rehabilitation, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Ocean Protection Council, the Department of Toxic Substances Control, and any other appropriate state and local agencies.

(3) As part of the regulatory process, the department shall seek input and feedback from stakeholders, including, but not limited to, food service packaging
 manufacturers, environmental and public health organizations, and food service facilities.

(b) (1) The regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used for determining the types of food service packaging that may be included on the list developed pursuant to Section 42370.3.

(2) The regulations shall also specify how the list shall be maintained and updated, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 42370.3.

(3) If determined practicable by the department, the department may establish a process to authorize regional use of food service packaging that is consistent with the requirements and considerations of this section.

(c) For purposes of determining if a type of food service packaging is reusable pursuant to
 subdivision (a), the director shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following criteria:

(1) Whether the packaging is conventionally disposed of after a single use.

(2) Whether the packaging is sufficiently durable and washable to allow for multiple uses.

(d) For purposes of determining if a type of food service packaging is recyclable pursuant to subdivision (a), the director shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following criteria:

(1) Whether the type of food service packaging is eligible to be labeled as “recyclable” in accordance with the uniform standards contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 17580) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) Whether the type of food service packaging is regularly collected, separated, and cleansed for recycling by recycling service providers.

(3) Whether the type of food service packaging is regularly sorted and aggregated into defined streams for recycling processes.

(4) Whether the type of food service packaging is regularly processed and reclaimed or recycled with commercial recycling processes.

(5) Whether the food service packaging material regularly becomes feedstock that is used in the production of new products.

(6) Whether the food service packaging material is recycled in sufficient quantity, and is of sufficient quality, to maintain a market value.

(e) For purposes
 of determining if a type of food service packaging is compostable pursuant to subdivision (a), the director shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following criteria:

(1) Whether the food service packaging will, in a safe and timely manner, break down or otherwise become part of usable compost that can be composted in a public or private aerobic compost facility designed for and capable of processing postconsumer food waste and food-soiled paper.

(2) Whether food service packaging made from plastic is certified to meet the ASTM standard specification identified in either subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42356 and adopted in accordance with Section 42356.1, if applicable.

(3) Whether the food service packaging is regularly collected and accepted for processing at public and
 private compost facilities.

(4) Whether the type of food service packaging is eligible to be labeled as “compostable” in accordance with the uniform standards contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 17580) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) (1) In developing regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may consult with local governments and representatives of the solid waste industry, the recycling industry, the compost industry, and food service packaging manufacturers to determine if a type of food service packaging is recyclable, reusable, or compostable.

(2) Local governments, solid waste facilities, recycling facilities, and composting facilities shall provide information requested by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) to
 the department.

(g) In developing regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may take into account potential impacts on litter, public health, and wildlife. In evaluating these impacts, the department may consider any of the following:

(1) Information on the volume of food service packaging litter obtained from state entities or organizations that regularly conduct litter cleanup activities.

(2) Litter reduction policies that would assist in compliance with the State Water Resources Control Board’s Statewide Trash Policy and the Ocean Protection Council’s Ocean Litter Prevention Strategy.

(3) Whether the Department of Toxic Substances Control has identified as a priority product a chemical used in the manufacture of a type of food service
 packaging pursuant to Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 69501) of Division 4.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) Existing scientific information available from the United States Food and Drug Administration and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment pertaining to the specific chemical used in the manufacture of a type of food service packaging.

(5) Information on the impacts that improperly disposed of food service packaging may have on wildlife, as well as policy recommendations, including waste collection infrastructure improvements, that could be implemented at state facilities to reduce the impact on wildlife.

(h) The department may convene a stakeholder group to assist the department in implementing this section that consists of, but is not limited to, litter prevention
 organizations, environmental organizations, and trade associations representing food service packaging manufacturers or suppliers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 233.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42370.3.

(a) The department shall develop a list of approved types of food service packaging that may be used by food service facilities and publish the list on its internet website within 90 days of the Office of Administrative Law approving the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42370.2. The department shall include on the list only a type of food service packaging that is reusable, recyclable, or compostable, as determined by the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42370.2.

(b) The department shall regularly, but no less than once every five years, evaluate the list of approved types of food service packaging to determine whether each type of approved food service packaging is reusable, recyclable, or compostable. After
 evaluation, the department may amend the list to remove or add a type of food service packaging based on whether it is reusable, recyclable, or compostable. The department shall post any updates to the list on its internet website.

(c) A manufacturer that seeks to have included on the list a type of food service packaging or material may be required by the department to submit data for purposes of the department’s evaluation of whether to include the type of food service packaging or material on the list.

(d) Development of, publication of, and updates made to the list pursuant to this section are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 234.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42370.4.

(a) On and after the date the list of approved types of food service packaging is published pursuant to Section 42370.3, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a food service facility shall not dispense prepared food using food service packaging unless the type of food service packaging is on that list.

(b) A food service facility may use food service packaging that is not on the list maintained and updated by the department pursuant to Section 42370.3 under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The food service facility possessed that specific inventory of food service packaging before the date the list was published.

(2) The food service facility possessed that specific inventory of food service packaging before the list maintained pursuant to Section 42370.3 was updated to remove the type of food service packaging and the type of food service packaging was on the list when the food service facility took possession of the food service packaging.

(3) The food service facility acquired that specific inventory of food service packaging pursuant to a contract entered into before the date the list was published.

(4) The food service facility acquired that specific inventory of food service packaging pursuant to a contract entered into before the list maintained pursuant to Section 42370.3 was updated to remove the type of food service packaging and the type of food service packaging was on the list when the food service facility entered into the contract.

(c) For a contract that is subject to this section and that is entered into, renewed, or updated after the date the list was published, the food service facility shall be responsible for ensuring that the food service packaging subject to the contract is in compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42370.5.

(a) In order to ensure compliance with this chapter, a food service facility shall provide, upon request by the department, reasonable and timely access, as determined by the department, to contracts, invoices, and purchase orders between the food service facility and a food service packaging manufacturer or distributor that include information demonstrating whether the food service packaging material acquired by the food service facility is in compliance with this chapter.

(b) A food service facility shall maintain any record related to the requirements of this chapter for a minimum of five years, or another period of time as determined by the department.

(c) Records supplied
 to the department pursuant to this section that are, at the time of submission, claimed to be trade secrets, proprietary, or confidential shall be subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17041) of Chapter 1 of Division 7 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42370.6.

(a) The Department of General Services or any state agency that is entering into a contract or agreement or amending an existing contract or agreement with a food service facility shall ensure that the relevant contract or agreement conforms to any applicable provisions of this chapter.

(b) The Department of General Services shall do all of the following:

(1) Publish, within 90 days of the date the list of approved types of food service packaging is published pursuant to Section 42370.3, the approved food service packaging types on its Internet Web site.

(2) Publish, within 90 days of the date the list of approved
 types of food service packaging is published pursuant to Section 42370.3, the requirements imposed on a food service facility under this chapter in the State Contracting Manual.

(3) Ensure that any new, modified, or renewed agreements, contracts, or procurement undertaken by a food service facility as part of a contract or agreement with the Department of General Services complies with the requirements of this chapter.

(4) When reasonably feasible, provide a food service facility with which it has a contract or agreement with resources to identify food service packaging suppliers, distributors, brokers, or manufacturers that sell the types of food service packaging approved pursuant to Section 42370.3.

(c) The Department of General Services shall take the appropriate steps, including, but not limited to, revising
 relevant state contracting and procurement rules and procedures, in order to fulfill the requirements of subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42370.7.

This chapter does not preempt the authority of a city, county, or city and county to adopt and enforce additional takeout food packaging ordinances, regulations, or policies that are more restrictive than the applicable standards required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.1. Small Plastic Bottles [42372. - 42372.]

42372.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Hosted rental” means a house, apartment, or other livable space where the person providing sleeping accommodations is a permanent resident who lives on the premises.

(2) “Lodging establishment” means an establishment that contains one or more sleeping room accommodations that are rented or otherwise provided to the public, including, but not limited to, a hotel, motel, resort, bed and breakfast inn, or vacation rental. “Lodging establishment” does not include a hospital, nursing home, residential retirement community, prison, jail,
 homeless
 shelter, boarding school, worker housing, long-term rental, or hosted rental.

(3) “Personal care product” means a product intended to be applied to or used on the human body in the shower, bath, or any part thereof and shall include only shampoo, hair conditioner, and bath soap.

(4) “Plastic” means any synthetic material made from organic polymers, such as polyethylene, polyvinyl chloride (PVC), or nylon, that can be molded into shape while soft and then set into a rigid or slightly elastic form. “Plastic” includes all materials identified with resin codes 1 to 7, inclusive, as provided in Section 18015.

(5) “Small plastic bottle” means a plastic bottle or container with less than a 6-ounce
 capacity that is intended to be nonreusable by the end user.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2023, for lodging establishments with more than 50 rooms, and January 1, 2024, for lodging establishments with 50 rooms or less, a lodging establishment shall not provide a small plastic bottle containing a personal care product to a person staying in a sleeping room accommodation, in any space within the sleeping room accommodation, or within bathrooms shared by the public or guests.

(c) A lodging establishment is encouraged to use bulk dispensers of personal care products to reduce plastic waste and lower operating costs, mindful of the health and safety of a person.

(d) A lodging establishment may provide personal care products
 in small plastic bottles to a person at no cost, upon request, at a place other than a sleeping room accommodation, a space within the sleeping room accommodation, or within bathrooms shared by the public or guests.

(e) A local agency with authority to inspect sleeping accommodations in a lodging establishment may issue a citation for a violation of subdivision (b). Upon a first violation, the local agency shall issue a written warning, which shall recite the violation and advise that subsequent violations may result in citations. Upon a second or subsequent violation, the local agency may impose a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the lodging establishment is in violation, but not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) annually.

(f) A
 lodging establishment in violation of subdivision (b) is liable for a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation and two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a second or subsequent violation. The Attorney General or a district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney may bring an action to impose a civil penalty pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) (1) On and after January 1, 2020, a city, county, or city and county shall not pass or enforce an ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule relating to personal care products in plastic bottles provided at lodging establishments, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) A city, county, or city and county that, before January 1, 2020, passed an ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule relating to personal care products in plastic bottles provided at lodging establishments may enforce that ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule, if it is at least as stringent as, and not in conflict with, this section.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that the prohibition of personal care products in plastic bottles as specified in this section is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California
 Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, counties, and cities and counties, including charter cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.   (AB 1162)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Expanded Polystyrene Loosefill Packaging [42390. - 42390.]

42390.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Manufacturer” means a person who manufactures expanded polystyrene loosefill packaging material for sale in this state.

(2) “Recycled material” means feedstock material from any of the following that has been diverted from landfill disposal:

(A) Material derived from a finished polystyrene product that has completed its intended end use and product life cycle.

(B) Material derived from a blemished, flawed, or otherwise unusable finished polystyrene product.

(C) Material derived from manufacturing and fabrication scrap from production of a finished polystyrene product.

(3) “Wholesaler” means a person who purchases expanded polystyrene loosefill packaging for resale in this state.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), on and after January 1, 2012, a wholesaler or manufacturer shall not sell or offer for sale in this state expanded polystyrene loosefill packaging material.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to expanded polystyrene loosefill packaging materials that complies with the following requirements:

(1) On and after January 1, 2012, until December 31, 2013, inclusive, it is comprised of at least 60 percent recycled material.

(2) On and after January 1, 2014, until December 31, 2016, inclusive, it is comprised of at least 80 percent recycled material.

(3) On and after January 1, 2017, it is comprised of 100 percent recycled material.

(d) A wholesaler or manufacturer who sells or offers for sale at retail in this state expanded polystyrene loosefill packaging material in violation of this chapter is guilty of an infraction and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.6. Reusable or Refillable Propane Cylinders  [42395. - 42395.2.]

42395.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “reusable” or “refillable” or “reuse” or “refill,” in regard to propane cylinders means a cylinder that satisfies all of the following:

(1) Explicitly designed and marketed to be utilized multiple times for the same product.

(2) Designed for durability to function properly in its original condition for multiple uses.

(3) Supported by adequate infrastructure to ensure the cylinders can be conveniently and safely reused or refilled for multiple cycles.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “propane cylinder” does not include any of the following:

(1) Cylinders that are customarily designed for use in the construction industry and, when full, contain less than 15 ounces of fuel, whether filled solely with propane or not.

(2) Cylinders that have an overall product height-to-width ratio of 3.55 to 1 or greater.

(3) Cylinders that are offered to a state or local government agency for purchase pursuant to the United States General Services Administration’s State and Local Disaster Purchasing Program, or a successor program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (SB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42395.1.
